District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.13

Transition.

For RBC reports required to be filed by health organizations with respect to 2002, the following requirements shall apply in lieu of the provisions of §§ 31-3451.03, 31-3451.04, 31-3451.05, and 31-3451.06:

(1)

In the event of a Company Action Level Event with respect to a domestic health organization, the Commissioner shall take no regulatory action under this chapter.

(2)

In the event of a Regulatory Action Level Event as defined under § 31-3451.01(19)(A) through (C), the Commissioner shall take the actions required under § 31-3451.03.

(3)

In the event of a Regulatory Action Level Event as defined under § 31-3451.01(19)(D) through (I), or an Authorized Control Level Event, the Commissioner shall take the action required under § 31-3451.04 with respect to the health organization.

(4)

In the event of a Mandatory Control Level Event, the Commissioner shall take the action required under § 31-3451.05.

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 113, 50 DCR 306
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 45(d), 52 DCR 2638
2001 Ed., § 31-3851.13.
D.C. Law 15-354 validated previously made technical corrections.